incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="šiat/or__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>or</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ri</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>or</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rom</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>or</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rov</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rom</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>roch</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rami</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vetríč/ek__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koch</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kami</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lip/eň__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňa</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňovi</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňa</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňovi</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eň</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňom</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eň</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňov</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňom</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňoch</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňami</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="triang/el__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elu</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lu</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lom</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lov</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lom</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>loch</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lami</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gáfor"><i>gáf</i><par n="šiat/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hámor"><i>hám</i><par n="šiat/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kufor"><i>kuf</i><par n="šiat/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lipeň"><i>lip</i><par n="lip/eň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sršeň"><i>srš</i><par n="lip/eň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="triangel"><i>triang</i><par n="triang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vetríček"><i>vetríč</i><par n="vetríč/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šiator"><i>šiat</i><par n="šiat/or__n"/></e>
